src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-u-verbs_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# (20240214: Csilla)

  Verb - ловиньтаӈкве: # Verb 'to read, to count' - full paradigm
    тотуӈкве+V+Inf: тотуӈкве
#Active, present tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: тотэ̄гум
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: тотэ̄гын
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: тоты
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: тотыме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [тотэ̄гын, тотэгы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: тотэ̄г
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: тотэ̄в
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [тотэ̄гын, тотэгы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: тотэ̄гыт

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, single object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg: тотылум
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg: тотылын
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg: тотытэ
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcSg: тотылуме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg: [тотылын, тотылы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcSg: тотытэ̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg: тотылув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg: [тотылын, тотылы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg: тотыяныл

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, dual object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcDu: тотыягум
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcDu: тотыягын
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcDu: тотыяге
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcDu: тотыягме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcDu: [тотыягын, тотыягы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcDu: тотыяге̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcDu: тотыягув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcDu: [тотыягын, тотыягы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcDu: тотыяганыл

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, plural object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl: тотыянум
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl: [тотыянын, тотыян]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl: тотыянэ
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcPl: тотыянаме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcPl: [тотыянын, тотыяны̄н, тотыян]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcPl: тотыянэ̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl: тотыянув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl: [тотыянын, тотыяны̄н, тотыян]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl: тотыяныл

#Active, past tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: тотсум
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: тотсын
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: тотыс
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: тотсуме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [тотсын, тотсы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: тотсыг
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: тотсув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [тотсын, тотсы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: тотсыт

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, single object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg: тотыслум
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcSg: тотыслын
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg: тотыстэ
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcSg: тотысламе̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcSg: [тотыслын, тотыслы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcSg: тотыстэ̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg: тотыслув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg: [тотыслын, тотыслы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg: тотсаныл

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, dual object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcDu: тотсагум
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcDu: тотсагын
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcDu: тотсаге
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcDu: тотсагме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcDu: [тотсагын, тотсагы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcDu: тотсаге̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcDu: тотсагув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcDu: [тотсагын, тотсагы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcDu: тотсаганыл

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, plural object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl: тотсанум
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcPl: [тотса̄нын, тотсан]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl: тотсанэ
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcPl: [тотсанаме̄н, тотсанме̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcPl: [тотсанын, тотсаны̄н, тотсан]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcPl: тотсанэ̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl: тотсанув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcPl: [тотсанын, тотсаны̄н, тотсан]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl: тотсаныл

#Active, conditional, subjective conjugation
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1: тотнувум
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2: тотнувын
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3: тотнув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1: тотнуваме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2: [тотнувын, тотнувы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3: тотнувыг
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1: тотнувув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2: [тотнувын, тотнувы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3: тотнувыт

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, single object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg: тотнувлум
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg: тотнувлын
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg: тотнувтэ
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcSg: тотнувламе̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcSg: [тотнувлын, тотнувлы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcSg: тотнувтэ̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg: тотнувлув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg: [тотнувлын, тотнувлы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg: тотнуваныл

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, dual object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcDu: тотнувагум
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcDu: тотнувагын
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcDu: тотнуваге
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcDu: тотнувагме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcDu: [тотнувагын, тотнувагы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcDu: тотнуваге̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcDu: тотнувагув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcDu: [тотнувагын, тотнувагы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcDu: тотнуваганыл

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, plural object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl: тотнуванум
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl: тотнуванын
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl: тотнуванэ
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcPl: тотнуванме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcPl: [тотнуванын, тотнуваны̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcPl: тотнуванэ̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl: тотнуванув
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl: [тотнуванын, тотнуваны̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl: тотнуваныл

#Active, imperative, subjective conjugation
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2: тотэн
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2: [тотэн, тотэ̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2: [тотэн, тотэ̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, single object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg: [тотэлн, тотэ̄лн]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcSg: [тотэлн, тотэлы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg: [тотэлн, тотэлы̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, dual object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcDu: [тотэгын, тотэ̄гн]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcDu: [тотэгын, тотэгы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcDu: [тотэгын, тотэгы̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, plural object
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl: [тотэн, тотэ̄н, тотэ̄нын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl: [тотэн, тотэ̄н, тотэ̄нын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl: [тотэн, тотэ̄н, тотэ̄нын]

#Passive, present tense, indicative
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: тотавем
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: тотавен
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: тотаве
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: тотавеме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [тотавен, тотаве̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: тотаве̄г
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: тотаве̄в
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [тотавен, тотаве̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: тотавет

#Passive, past tense, indicative
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: тотве̄сум
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: тотве̄сын
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [тотвес, тотве̄с]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: тотвесаме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [тотвесын, тотвесы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: тотвесы̄г
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: тотвесув
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [тотвесын, тотвесы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: тотве̄сыт

#Passive, conditional
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg1: тотнувем
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg2: тотнувен
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg3: тотнуве
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu1: тотнувеме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu2: [тотнувен, тотнуве̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu3: тотнуве̄г
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl1: тотнуве̄в
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl2: [тотнувен, тотнуве̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl3: тотнувет
 
#Passive, imperative conjugation
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Sg2: тотавен
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Du2: [тотавен, тотаве̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Pl2: [тотавен, тотаве̄н]

#Present participle
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc: тотнэ
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg1: тотнэм
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg2: тотнэн 
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg3: тотнэ̄тэ
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu1: тотнэме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu2: [тотнэн, тотнэ̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu3: тотнэтэ̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl1: [тотнэв, тотнэ̄в]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl2: [тотнэн, тотнэ̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl3: тотнэныл

#Present participle, single object
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg1+OcSg: тотнэ̄лум
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg2+OcSg: тотнэ̄лын
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg3+OcSg: тотнэ̄тэ
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu1+OcSg: тотнэламе̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu2+OcSg: [тотнэ̄лын, тотнэлы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu3+OcSg: тотнэтэ̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl1+OcSg: тотнэлув
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl2+OcSg: [тотнэ̄лын, тотнэлы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl3+OcSg: тотнэ̄ныл

#Present participle, dual object
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg1+OcDu: тотнэ̄гум
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg2+OcDu: тотнэ̄гын
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg3+OcDu: тотнэ̄гэ
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu1+OcDu: тотнэгаме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu2+OcDu: [тотнэ̄гын, тотнэгы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu3+OcDu: тотнэгэ̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl1+OcDu: тотнэгув
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl2+OcDu: [тотнэ̄гагын, тотнэгагы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl3+OcDu: тотнэганыл

#Present participle, plural object
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg1+OcPl: тотнэ̄нум
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg2+OcPl: [тотнэ̄нын, тотнэ̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScSg3+OcPl: тотнэ̄нэ
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu1+OcPl: [тотнэнаме̄н, тотнэнанме̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu2+OcPl: [тотнэны̄н, тотнэныны̄н, тотнэнаны̄н] 
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScDu3+OcPl: [тотнэнэ̄н, тотнэнанэ̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl1+OcPl: [тотнэнув, тотнэнанув]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl2+OcPl: [тотнэны̄н, тотнэнаны̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+ScPl3+OcPl: [тотнэ̄ныл, тотнэ̄наныл]

#Past participle
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc: тотум
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1: тотмум
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2: тотмын
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3: тотме
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1: тотмаме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2: [тотмын, тотмы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3: тотмыг
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1: тотмув
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2: [тотмын, тотмы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3: тотмыт

#Past participle, single object
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1+OcSg: тотамлум
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2+OcSg: тотамлын
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3+OcSg: тотамтэ
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1+OcSg: тотамламе̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2+OcSg: [тотамлын, тотмылы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3+OcSg: тотамтэ̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1+OcSg: тотамлув
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2+OcSg: [тотамлын, тотмылы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3+OcSg: тотаманыл
